Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-317d, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-317d. A. As used in this section:


1. “Sudden arrhythmic death syndrome” (SADS) means the sudden


and unexpected death due to cardiac arrhythmia, as determined by


performance of an investigation, of a young, apparently healthy


individual with no previously diagnosed structural heart disease;


2. “Sudden death in the young” (SDY) means the sudden and


unexpected death of an individual younger than twenty (20) years of

Req. No. 2468 Page 1


age due to natural causes including, but not limited to, sudden


cardiac death or sudden unexpected death in epilepsy (SUDEP), which


death remains unexplained after investigation;


3. “Sudden infant death syndrome” (SIDS) means the sudden death


of an infant younger than one year of age that remains unexplained


after investigation;


4. “Sudden unexpected infant death” (SUID) means the sudden and


unexpected death of an infant younger than one (1) year of age,


whether explained or unexplained, including, but not limited to,


death caused by SIDS, accidental suffocation, or other potential


causes; and


5. “Sudden Unexpected Infant Death (SUID) and Sudden Death in


the Young (SDY) Case Registry” means the national surveillance


system coordinated by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention


and the National Institutes of Health which collects standardized


data on sudden and unexpected deaths in individuals younger than


twenty (20) years of age.


B. 1. When the death of an infant occurs or child dies


suddenly and unexpectedly in this state and the cause of death is


considered undetermined, including cases of SIDS, SUID, or SDY, a


medical examiner shall conduct a sudden unexplained infant death


investigation (SUIDI) an investigation not more than forty-eight


(48) hours after the death has occurred. The medical examiner or a


medical examiner investigator currently certified by the American

Req. No. 2468 Page 2


Board of Medicolegal Death Investigators shall investigation shall


include:


a. an autopsy if deemed necessary by the medical examiner


to determine the cause of death,


b. microscopic and toxicology studies,


c. a review of the infant’s or child’s immunization and


medical records, as available through the state’s


immunization registry, from the infant’s or child’s


pediatrician or primary care practitioner, or from


other sources, and


d. an interview of the parent, legal guardian or


caregiver of, or person who last had contact with, the


deceased infant and shall fill out the Centers for


Disease Control and Prevention’s SUIDI reporting form


accordingly or child.


2. The medical examiner shall document in the investigative


report any immunizations or emergency countermeasures administered


to the infant or child within ninety (90) days before the infant’s


or child’s death, report the case to the SUID and SDY Case Registry


in accordance with protocols established by the Board of Medicolegal


Investigations and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,


and forward such report to the State Department of Health.





Req. No. 2468 Page 3


C. 1. When a sudden death of an individual of any age that is


suspected to be caused by SADS occurs, a medical examiner shall


conduct an investigation. The investigation shall include:


a. an autopsy if deemed necessary by the medical examiner


to determine the cause of death,


b. microscopic and toxicology studies, and


c. a review of the individual’s immunization and medical


records, as available through state health databases


or other sources.


2. The medical examiner shall document in the investigative


report any immunizations or emergency countermeasures administered


to the individual within ninety (90) days before his or her death,


report the case to the SUID and SDY Case Registry if the individual


was younger than twenty (20) years of age at the time of death, in


accordance with protocols established by the Board of Medicolegal


Investigations and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,


and forward such report to the State Department of Health.


D. The State Department of Health shall retain a copy of each


completed SUIDI reporting form in order to compile report for the


purpose of compiling accurate and reliable data on SUIDI SIDS, SUID,


SDY, and SADS to aid and inform the policies of the Department, and


the Department shall provide a copy of each completed SUIDI


reporting form to the Child Death Review Board.



Req. No. 2468 Page 4


B. As used in this section, “medical examiner” means the Chief


Medical Examiner, the Deputy Chief Medical Examiner or a medical


examiner appointed by the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to Section


937 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 938, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 938), is amended to read as follows:


Section 938. A. All human deaths of the types listed herein


shall be investigated as provided by law:


1. Violent deaths, whether apparently homicidal, suicidal, or


accidental;


2. Deaths under suspicious, unusual, or unnatural


circumstances;


3. Deaths related to disease which might constitute a threat to


public health;


4. Deaths unattended by a licensed physician for a fatal or


potentially fatal illness;


5. Deaths that are medically unexpected and that occur in the


course of a therapeutic procedure;


6. Deaths of any persons detained or occurring in custody of


the Department of Corrections or a county jail;


7. Deaths of persons whose bodies are to be cremated,


transported out of the state, donated to educational entities, to



Req. No. 2468 Page 5


include limited portions of the body, or otherwise made ultimately


unavailable for pathological study; and


8. Maternal deaths that occur during pregnancy or within one


(1) year of termination of pregnancy reported by a hospital or


birthing center under Section 2 of this act Section 1-702f of this


title; and


9. Deaths involving sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS), sudden


unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden death in the young (SDY), or


sudden arrhythmic death syndrome (SADS) as provided by Section 1-


317d of this title.


B. The Chief Medical Examiner shall state on the certificate of


death of all persons whose death was caused by execution pursuant to


a lawful court order that the cause of death was the execution of


such order.


SECTION 3. RECODIFICATION 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-317d,


as amended by Section 1 of this act, shall be recodified as Section


941c of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, unless there is created a


duplication in numbering.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2468 DC 1/8/2026 7:17:40 PM







Req. No. 2468 Page 6